Utah statutes.
59-2-702.   Education and training of appraisers -- Continuing education for appraisers and county assessors.

(1)  The commission shall conduct, at its own expense, a program of education and training of appraisal personnel preparatory to the examination of applicants for appraisers' and assessors' certification or licensure required by Section  59-2-701.

(2)  To ensure that the assessment of property will be performed in a professional manner by competent personnel, meeting specified professional qualifications, the commission shall conduct a continuing program of in-service education and training for county assessors and property appraisers in the principles and practices of assessment and appraisal of property.  For this purpose the commission may cooperate with educational institutions, local, regional, state, or national assessors' organizations, and with other appropriate professional organizations.  The commission may reimburse the participation expenses incurred by assessors and other employees of the state or its subdivisions whose attendance at in-service training programs is approved by the commission.



Amended by Chapter 214, 2001 General Session

